Nevada, session 83, AB356.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 288.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.510 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any collective
bargaining agreement negotiated pursuant to the provisions of NRS
288.400 to 288.630, inclusive, the Governor [may] :
(a) Shall, to the extent practicable, include in the biennial
proposed executive budget of the State any amount of money to be
paid as agreed upon in a collective bargaining agreement; and
(b) May include in the biennial proposed executive budget of the
State any amount of money the Governor deems appropriate for the
salaries, wage rates or any other form of direct monetary
compensation for employees.
2. If the Governor determines it is impracticable to include
any amount of money to be paid as agreed upon in a collective
bargaining agreement in the biennial proposed executive budget,
he or she must submit a report to the Legislature stating the
reason for such a determination. The report must be submitted on
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
the same day the biennial proposed executive budget is submitted
to the Legislature.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 288.565 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.565 1. The Governor shall designate a representative to
conduct negotiations concerning collective bargaining agreements
on behalf of the Executive Department. The representative may,
with the approval of the Governor, delegate the responsibility to
conduct such negotiations to another person.
2. A representative designated pursuant to subsection 1 and an
exclusive representative shall:
(a) Begin negotiations concerning a collective bargaining
agreement [within 60 days after one party notifies the other party of
the desire to negotiate or] on or before [October] April 1 of each
even-numbered year ; [, whichever is earlier;] and
(b) Before beginning negotiations concerning a collective
bargaining agreement pursuant to paragraph (a), select a mediator
and arbitrator for the purposes of mediation and arbitration pursuant
to NRS 288.570 and 288.575, respectively, and, to the extent
possible, determine and reserve with the mediator and arbitrator
selected by the parties the calendar days when such mediation and
arbitration would occur should the parties not reach a collective
bargaining agreement.
3. [As soon as practicable] Within 60 days after the Board
designates an exclusive representative of an unrepresented
bargaining unit pursuant to NRS 288.400 to 288.630, inclusive, the
exclusive representative shall engage in collective bargaining with
the representative designated pursuant to subsection 1 as required by
NRS 288.540 to establish a collective bargaining agreement with a
term ending on June 30 of the next odd-numbered year.
Sec. 2. NRS 288.570 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.570 1. Either party may request a mediator selected
pursuant to NRS 288.565 if the parties do not reach a collective
bargaining agreement:
(a) [Within 120 days after the date on which the parties began]
After at least six meetings of negotiations or on or before
[February 1] September 5 of an [odd-numbered] even-numbered
year, whichever is earlier [;] , when one of the parties is a
bargaining unit with an existing collective bargaining agreement;
or
(b) [On or before any later date set by agreement of the parties.]
After at least eight meetings of negotiations or 90 days after the
date on which the parties begin negotiations, whichever is earlier,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
when one of the parties is a bargaining unit negotiating to enter a
collective bargaining agreement for the first time.
2. The mediator shall bring the parties together as soon as
possible after a request is made pursuant to subsection 1 and shall
attempt to settle each issue in dispute within 10 days after the
request was made pursuant to subsection 1 or any later date set by
agreement of the parties.
Sec. 3. NRS 288.575 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.575 1. If a mediator requested pursuant to NRS 288.570
determines that his or her services are no longer helpful or if the
parties do not reach a collective bargaining agreement through
mediation within 10 days after a request made pursuant to NRS
288.570 or on or before any later date set by agreement of the
parties, the mediator shall discontinue mediation and the parties
shall engage in arbitration. Any proposal that conflicts or is
otherwise inconsistent with any provision of state law, other than the
provisions of chapters 284 and 287 of NRS, shall be considered
withdrawn by the proposing party when mediation is discontinued.
2. The arbitrator shall begin arbitration proceedings on or
before [February] September 15 of an [odd-numbered] even-
numbered year or any later date set by agreement of the parties.
3. The arbitrator and the parties shall apply and follow the
procedures for arbitration that are prescribed by any rules adopted
by the Board pursuant to NRS 288.110. During arbitration, the
parties retain their respective duties to negotiate in good faith.
4. The arbitrator may administer oaths or affirmations, take
testimony and issue and seek enforcement of a subpoena in the same
manner as the Board pursuant to NRS 288.120, and, except as
otherwise provided in subsection 6, the provisions of NRS 288.120
apply to any subpoena issued by the arbitrator.
5. The arbitrator shall render a decision on or before [March]
December 5 of an [odd-numbered] even-numbered year . [or any
later date set by agreement of the parties.]
6. The Executive Department and the exclusive representative
shall each pay one-half of the cost of arbitration.
Sec. 4. NRS 353.228 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.228 1. The Economic Forum impaneled pursuant to NRS
353.226 shall:
(a) Make such projections for economic indicators as it deems
necessary to ensure that an accurate estimate is produced pursuant to
paragraph (b);
(b) Provide an accurate estimate of the revenue that will be
collected by the State for general, unrestricted uses, and not for
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
special purposes, during the biennium that begins on July 1 of the
year following the date on which the Economic Forum was
empaneled;
(c) Request such technical assistance as the Economic Forum
deems necessary from the Technical Advisory Committee created
by NRS 353.229;
(d) On or before [December 3] November 15 of each even-
numbered year, prepare a written report of its projections of
economic indicators and estimate of future state revenue required by
paragraphs (a) and (b) and present the report to the Governor and
the Legislature;
(e) On or before May 1 of each odd-numbered year, prepare a
written report confirming or revising the projections of economic
indicators and estimate of future state revenue contained in the
report prepared pursuant to paragraph (d) and present the report to
the Governor and the Legislature; and
(f) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, on or before
June 10 of each even-numbered year and December 10 of each odd-
numbered year, hold a meeting to consider current economic
indicators, including, without limitation, employment,
unemployment, personal income and any other indicators deemed
appropriate by the Economic Forum. Based on current economic
indicators, the Economic Forum shall update the status of actual
State General Fund revenue compared to the most recent forecast of
the Economic Forum. The provisions of this paragraph are not
intended to authorize the Economic Forum to make additional
forecasts pursuant to paragraph (b). At the next appropriate meeting
of the Interim Finance Committee, the Chair of the Economic
Forum or a member of the staff of the Economic Forum shall
present to the Interim Finance Committee such matters considered at
the meeting of the Economic Forum held pursuant to this paragraph,
as the Economic Forum determines appropriate. Any such
information presented to the Interim Finance Committee must be
made available on the Internet website of the Legislature.
2. If the deadline for preparing a report or holding a meeting as
required in subsection 1 falls on a Saturday, Sunday or legal
holiday, the deadline is extended to the second business day
following the deadline.
3. The Economic Forum may make preliminary projections of
economic indicators and estimates of future state revenue at any
time. Any such projections and estimates must be made available to
the various agencies of the State through the Chief.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
4. The Economic Forum may request information directly from
any state agency, including, without limitation, the Nevada System
of Higher Education. A state agency, including, without limitation,
the Nevada System of Higher Education, that receives a reasonable
request for information from the Economic Forum shall comply
with the request as soon as is reasonably practicable after receiving
the request.
5. The Economic Forum may request direct testimony from
any state agency, including, without limitation, the Nevada System
of Higher Education, at a meeting of the Economic Forum or the
Technical Advisory Committee. The head, or a designee thereof, of
a state agency, including, without limitation, the Nevada System of
Higher Education, who receives a reasonable request for direct
testimony at a meeting of the Economic Forum or the Technical
Advisory Committee shall appear at the meeting and shall comply
with the request.
6. To carry out its duties pursuant to this section, the Economic
Forum may consider any information received from the Technical
Advisory Committee and any other information received from
independent sources.
7. Copies of the projections and estimates made pursuant to
this section must be made available to the public by the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for the cost of reproducing the
material.
Sec. 4.3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Human Resource Management of
the Department of Administration for personnel, travel, operating
and information services costs associated with carrying out the
provisions of this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $144,474
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $189,623
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
Sec. 4.7. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of the Governor for personnel, operating,
equipment and information services costs associated with carrying
out the provisions of this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $142,566
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $183,920
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 5. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provisions of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit
a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 6. 1. This section and sections 4.3 and 4.7 of this act
become effective on July 1, 2025.
2. Sections 1 to 4, inclusive, and 5 of this act become effective
on October 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)